Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.130

Identity of fruit and vegetables to be maintained by CA number and inspection number to retail market.

The identity of any fruits or vegetables represented as having been stored in a room or warehouse subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be maintained, by the CA number issued to the licensee in whose warehouse such fruits and vegetables were stored and the state lot inspection number issued by the director for such fruits or vegetables, from the time it leaves such warehouse through the various channels of trade and transportation to the retailer.

[ 1961 c 29 s 13.]